Florida, session 2026, SB830.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âParagraph (d) of subsection (4) of section 21 119.071, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 22 119.071âGeneral exemptions from inspection or copying of 23 public records.â 24 (4)âAGENCY PERSONNEL INFORMATION.â 25 (d)1.âFor purposes of this paragraph, the term: 26 a.ââHome addressesâ means the dwelling location at which an 27 individual resides and includes the physical address, mailing 28 address, street address, parcel identification number, plot 29 identification number, legal property description, neighborhood 30 name and lot number, GPS coordinates, and any other descriptive 31 property information that may reveal the home address. 32 b.ââJudicial assistantâ means a court employee assigned to 33 the following class codes: 8140, 8150, 8310, and 8320. 34 c.ââTelephone numbersâ includes home telephone numbers, 35 personal cellular telephone numbers, personal pager telephone 36 numbers, and telephone numbers associated with personal 37 communications devices. 38 2.a.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 39 and photographs of active or former sworn law enforcement 40 personnel or of active or former civilian personnel employed by 41 a law enforcement agency, including correctional and 42 correctional probation officers, personnel of the Department of 43 Children and Families whose duties include the investigation of 44 abuse, neglect, exploitation, fraud, theft, or other criminal 45 activities, personnel of the Department of Health whose duties 46 are to support the investigation of child abuse or neglect, and 47 personnel of the Department of Revenue or local governments 48 whose responsibilities include revenue collection and 49 enforcement or child support enforcement; the names, home 50 addresses, telephone numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and 51 places of employment of the spouses and children of such 52 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 53 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 54 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 55 Constitution. 56 b.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 57 and photographs of current or former nonsworn investigative 58 personnel of the Department of Financial Services whose duties 59 include the investigation of fraud, theft, workersâ compensation 60 coverage requirements and compliance, other related criminal 61 activities, or state regulatory requirement violations; the 62 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 63 places of employment of the spouses and children of such 64 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 65 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 66 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 67 Constitution. 68 c.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 69 and photographs of current or former nonsworn investigative 70 personnel of the Office of Financial Regulationâs Bureau of 71 Financial Investigations whose duties include the investigation 72 of fraud, theft, other related criminal activities, or state 73 regulatory requirement violations; the names, home addresses, 74 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 75 the spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and 76 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 77 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 78 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 79 d.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 80 and photographs of current or former firefighters certified in 81 compliance with s. 633.408; the names, home addresses, telephone 82 numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment 83 of the spouses and children of such firefighters; and the names 84 and locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 85 children of such firefighters are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 86 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 87 e.âThe home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone 88 numbers of current or former justices of the Supreme Court, 89 district court of appeal judges, circuit court judges, and 90 county court judges and current judicial assistants; the names, 91 home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of 92 employment of the spouses and children of current or former 93 justices and judges and current judicial assistants; and the 94 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 95 by the children of current or former justices and judges and of 96 current judicial assistants are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 97 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph 98 is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in 99 accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 100 2028, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment 101 by the Legislature. 102 f.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 103 and photographs of current or former state attorneys, assistant 104 state attorneys, statewide prosecutors, or assistant statewide 105 prosecutors; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 106 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the 107 spouses and children of current or former state attorneys, 108 assistant state attorneys, statewide prosecutors, or assistant 109 statewide prosecutors; and the names and locations of schools 110 and day care facilities attended by the children of current or 111 former state attorneys, assistant state attorneys, statewide 112 prosecutors, or assistant statewide prosecutors are exempt from 113 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 114 g.âThe home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone 115 numbers of general magistrates, special magistrates, judges of 116 compensation claims, administrative law judges of the Division 117 of Administrative Hearings, and child support enforcement 118 hearing officers; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 119 dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses and 120 children of general magistrates, special magistrates, judges of 121 compensation claims, administrative law judges of the Division 122 of Administrative Hearings, and child support enforcement 123 hearing officers; and the names and locations of schools and day 124 care facilities attended by the children of general magistrates, 125 special magistrates, judges of compensation claims, 126 administrative law judges of the Division of Administrative 127 Hearings, and child support enforcement hearing officers are 128 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 129 Constitution. 130 h.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 131 and photographs of current or former human resource, labor 132 relations, or employee relations directors, assistant directors, 133 managers, or assistant managers of any local government agency 134 or water management district whose duties include hiring and 135 firing employees, labor contract negotiation, administration, or 136 other personnel-related duties; the names, home addresses, 137 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 138 the spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and 139 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 140 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 141 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 142 i.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 143 and photographs of current or former code enforcement officers; 144 the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 145 and places of employment of the spouses and children of such 146 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 147 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 148 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 149 Constitution. 150 j.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, places of 151 employment, dates of birth, and photographs of current or former 152 guardians ad litem, as defined in s. 39.01; the names, home 153 addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of 154 employment of the spouses and children of such persons; and the 155 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 156 by the children of such persons are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 157 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 158 k.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 159 and photographs of current or former juvenile probation 160 officers, juvenile probation supervisors, detention 161 superintendents, assistant detention superintendents, juvenile 162 justice detention officers I and II, juvenile justice detention 163 officer supervisors, juvenile justice residential officers, 164 juvenile justice residential officer supervisors I and II, 165 juvenile justice counselors, juvenile justice counselor 166 supervisors, human services counselor administrators, senior 167 human services counselor administrators, rehabilitation 168 therapists, and social services counselors of the Department of 169 Juvenile Justice; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 170 dates of birth, and places of employment of spouses and children 171 of such personnel; and the names and locations of schools and 172 day care facilities attended by the children of such personnel 173 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 174 Constitution. 175 l.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 176 and photographs of current or former public defenders, assistant 177 public defenders, criminal conflict and civil regional counsel, 178 and assistant criminal conflict and civil regional counsel; the 179 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 180 places of employment of the spouses and children of current or 181 former public defenders, assistant public defenders, criminal 182 conflict and civil regional counsel, and assistant criminal 183 conflict and civil regional counsel; and the names and locations 184 of schools and day care facilities attended by the children of 185 current or former public defenders, assistant public defenders, 186 criminal conflict and civil regional counsel, and assistant 187 criminal conflict and civil regional counsel are exempt from s. 188 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 189 m.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 190 and photographs of current or former investigators or inspectors 191 of the Department of Business and Professional Regulation; the 192 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 193 places of employment of the spouses and children of such current 194 or former investigators and inspectors; and the names and 195 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 196 children of such current or former investigators and inspectors 197 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 198 Constitution. 199 n.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, and dates of 200 birth of county tax collectors; the names, home addresses, 201 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 202 the spouses and children of such tax collectors; and the names 203 and locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 204 children of such tax collectors are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 205 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 206 o.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 207 and photographs of current or former personnel of the Department 208 of Health whose duties include, or result in, the determination 209 or adjudication of eligibility for social security disability 210 benefits, the investigation or prosecution of complaints filed 211 against health care practitioners, or the inspection of health 212 care practitioners or health care facilities licensed by the 213 Department of Health; the names, home addresses, telephone 214 numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses 215 and children of such personnel; and the names and locations of 216 schools and day care facilities attended by the children of such 217 personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 218 the State Constitution. 219 p.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 220 and photographs of current or former impaired practitioner 221 consultants who are retained by an agency or current or former 222 employees of an impaired practitioner consultant whose duties 223 result in a determination of a personâs skill and safety to 224 practice a licensed profession; the names, home addresses, 225 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 226 the spouses and children of such consultants or their employees; 227 and the names and locations of schools and day care facilities 228 attended by the children of such consultants or employees are 229 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 230 Constitution. 231 q.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 232 and photographs of current or former emergency medical 233 technicians or paramedics certified under chapter 401; the 234 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 235 places of employment of the spouses and children of such 236 emergency medical technicians or paramedics; and the names and 237 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 238 children of such emergency medical technicians or paramedics are 239 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 240 Constitution. 241 r.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 242 and photographs of current or former personnel employed in an 243 agencyâs office of inspector general or internal audit 244 department whose duties include auditing or investigating waste, 245 fraud, abuse, theft, exploitation, or other activities that 246 could lead to criminal prosecution or administrative discipline; 247 the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 248 and places of employment of spouses and children of such 249 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 250 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 251 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 252 Constitution. 253 s.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 254 and photographs of current or former directors, managers, 255 supervisors, nurses, and clinical employees of an addiction 256 treatment facility; the home addresses, telephone numbers, 257 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the 258 spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and 259 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 260 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 261 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. For purposes of this 262 sub-subparagraph, the term âaddiction treatment facilityâ means 263 a county government, or agency thereof, that is licensed 264 pursuant to s. 397.401 and provides substance abuse prevention, 265 intervention, or clinical treatment, including any licensed 266 service component described in s. 397.311(27). 267 t.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 268 and photographs of current or former directors, managers, 269 supervisors, and clinical employees of a child advocacy center 270 that meets the standards of s. 39.3035(2) and fulfills the 271 screening requirement of s. 39.3035(3), and the members of a 272 Child Protection Team as described in s. 39.303 whose duties 273 include supporting the investigation of child abuse or sexual 274 abuse, child abandonment, child neglect, and child exploitation 275 or to provide services as part of a multidisciplinary case 276 review team; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 277 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the 278 spouses and children of such personnel and members; and the 279 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 280 by the children of such personnel and members are exempt from s. 281 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 282 u.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, places of 283 employment, dates of birth, and photographs of current or former 284 staff and domestic violence advocates, as defined in s. 285 90.5036(1)(b), of domestic violence centers certified by the 286 Department of Children and Families under chapter 39; the names, 287 home addresses, telephone numbers, places of employment, dates 288 of birth, and photographs of the spouses and children of such 289 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 290 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 291 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 292 Constitution. 293 v.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 294 and photographs of current or former inspectors or investigators 295 of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services; the 296 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 297 places of employment of the spouses and children of current or 298 former inspectors or investigators; and the names and locations 299 of schools and day care facilities attended by the children of 300 current or former inspectors or investigators are exempt from s. 301 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This 302 sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review 303 Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on 304 October 2, 2028, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through 305 reenactment by the Legislature. 306 w.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 307 and photographs of current county attorneys, assistant county 308 attorneys, deputy county attorneys, city attorneys, assistant 309 city attorneys, and deputy city attorneys; the names, home 310 addresses, telephone numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and 311 places of employment of the spouses and children of current 312 county attorneys, assistant county attorneys, deputy county 313 attorneys, city attorneys, assistant city attorneys, and deputy 314 city attorneys; and the names and locations of schools and day 315 care facilities attended by the children of current county 316 attorneys, assistant county attorneys, deputy county attorneys, 317 city attorneys, assistant city attorneys, and deputy city 318 attorneys are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 319 the State Constitution. This exemption does not apply to a 320 county attorney, assistant county attorney, deputy county 321 attorney, city attorney, assistant city attorney, or deputy city 322 attorney who qualifies as a candidate for election to public 323 office. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open Government 324 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 325 repealed on October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and saved from 326 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 327 x.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 328 and photographs of current or former commissioners of the 329 Florida Gaming Control Commission; the names, home addresses, 330 telephone numbers, dates of birth, photographs, and places of 331 employment of the spouses and children of such current or former 332 commissioners; and the names and locations of schools and day 333 care facilities attended by the children of such current or 334 former commissioners are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), 335 Art. I of the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is 336 subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance 337 with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2029, 338 unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the 339 Legislature. 340 y.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 341 and photographs of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy 342 clerks of the circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court 343 personnel; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates 344 of birth, and places of employment of the spouses and children 345 of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy clerks of the 346 circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court personnel; and the 347 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 348 by the children of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy 349 clerks of the circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court 350 personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 351 the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the 352 Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 353 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and 354 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 355 z.(I)âAs used in this sub-subparagraph, the term: 356 (A)ââCongressional memberâ means a person who is elected to 357 serve as a member of the United States House of Representatives 358 or is elected or appointed to serve as a member of the United 359 States Senate. 360 (B)ââPartial home addressâ means the dwelling location at 361 which an individual resides and includes the physical address, 362 mailing address, street address, parcel identification number, 363 plot identification number, legal property description, 364 neighborhood name and lot number, GPS coordinates, and any other 365 descriptive property information that may reveal the partial 366 home address, except for the city and zip code. 367 (C)ââPublic officerâ means a person who holds one of the 368 following offices: Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Chief 369 Financial Officer, Attorney General, Agriculture Commissioner, 370 state representative, state senator, property appraiser, 371 supervisor of elections, school superintendent, school board 372 member, mayor, city commissioner, or county commissioner. 373 (II)âThe following information is exempt from s. 119.07(1) 374 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution: 375 (A)âThe partial home addresses of a current congressional 376 member or public officer and his or her spouse or adult child. 377 (B)âThe telephone numbers of a current congressional member 378 or public officer and his or her spouse or adult child. 379 (C)âThe name, home addresses, telephone numbers, and date 380 of birth of a minor child of a current congressional member or 381 public officer and the name and location of the school or day 382 care facility attended by the minor child. 383 (III)âThis sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open 384 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and 385 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2030, unless reviewed and 386 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 387 aa.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, and dates of 388 birth of current county administrators, deputy county 389 administrators, assistant county administrators, city managers, 390 deputy city managers, and assistant city managers; the names, 391 home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, photographs, 392 and places of employment of the spouses and children of current 393 county administrators, deputy county administrators, assistant 394 county administrators, city managers, deputy city managers, and 395 assistant city managers; and the names and locations of schools 396 and day care facilities attended by the children of current 397 county administrators, deputy county administrators, assistant 398 county administrators, city managers, deputy city managers, and 399 assistant city managers are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 400 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph 401 is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in 402 accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 403 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment 404 by the Legislature. 405 3.a.âAn agency that is the custodian of the information 406 specified in subparagraph 2. and that is not the employer of the 407 officer, employee, justice, judge, or other person specified in 408 subparagraph 2. must maintain the exempt status of that 409 information only if the officer, employee, justice, judge, other 410 person, or employing agency of the designated employee submits a 411 written and notarized request for maintenance of the exemption 412 to the custodial agency. The request must state under oath the 413 statutory basis for the individualâs exemption request and 414 confirm the individualâs status as a party eligible for exempt 415 status. 416 b.âAn agency that is the custodian of information specified 417 in sub-subparagraph 2.z. and that is not the employer of the 418 congressional member, public officer, or other person specified 419 in sub-subparagraph 2.z. must maintain the exempt status of that 420 information only if an individual requests the maintenance of an 421 exemption pursuant to sub-subparagraph 2.z. on the basis of 422 eligibility as a current congressional member or public officer 423 and his or her spouse or child submits, as part of the written 424 and notarized request required by sub-subparagraph a., the date 425 of the congressional memberâs or public officerâs election or 426 appointment to public office, the date on which that office is 427 next subject to election, and, if applicable, the date on which 428 the current congressional memberâs or public officerâs minor 429 child reaches the age of majority. The custodian must maintain 430 an exemption granted pursuant to sub-subparagraph 2.z. until the 431 qualifying conditions for the exemption no longer apply to the 432 person subject to the exemption. 433 4.a.âA county property appraiser, as defined in s. 434 192.001(3), or a county tax collector, as defined in s. 435 192.001(4), who receives a written and notarized request for 436 maintenance of the exemption pursuant to subparagraph 3. must 437 comply by removing the name of the individual with exempt status 438 and the instrument number or Official Records book and page 439 number identifying the property with the exempt status from all 440 publicly available records maintained by the property appraiser 441 or tax collector. For written requests received on or before 442 July 1, 2021, a county property appraiser or county tax 443 collector must comply with this sub-subparagraph by October 1, 444 2021. A county property appraiser or county tax collector may 445 not remove the street address, legal description, or other 446 information identifying real property within the agencyâs 447 records so long as a name or personal information otherwise 448 exempt from inspection and copying pursuant to this section is 449 not associated with the property or otherwise displayed in the 450 public records of the agency. 451 b.âAny information restricted from public display, 452 inspection, or copying under sub-subparagraph a. must be 453 provided to the individual whose information was removed. 454 5.âAn officer, an employee, a justice, a judge, or other 455 person specified in subparagraph 2. may submit a written request 456 for the release of his or her exempt information to the 457 custodial agency. The written request must be notarized and must 458 specify the information to be released and the party authorized 459 to receive the information. Upon receipt of the written request, 460 the custodial agency must release the specified information to 461 the party authorized to receive such information. 462 6.âThe exemptions in this paragraph apply to information 463 held by an agency before, on, or after the effective date of the 464 exemption. 465 7.âInformation made exempt under this paragraph may be 466 disclosed pursuant to s. 28.2221 to a title insurer authorized 467 pursuant to s. 624.401 and its affiliates as defined in s. 468 624.10; a title insurance agent or title insurance agency as 469 defined in s. 626.841(1) or (2), respectively; or an attorney 470 duly admitted to practice law in this state and in good standing 471 with The Florida Bar. 472 8.âThe exempt status of a home address contained in the 473 Official Records is maintained only during the period when a 474 protected party resides at the dwelling location. Upon 475 conveyance of real property after October 1, 2021, and when such 476 real property no longer constitutes a protected partyâs home 477 address as defined in sub-subparagraph 1.a., the protected party 478 must submit a written request to release the removed information 479 to the county recorder. The written request to release the 480 removed information must be notarized, must confirm that a 481 protected partyâs request for release is pursuant to a 482 conveyance of his or her dwelling location, and must specify the 483 Official Records book and page, instrument number, or clerkâs 484 file number for each document containing the information to be 485 released. 486 9.âUpon the death of a protected party as verified by a 487 certified copy of a death certificate or court order, any party 488 can request the county recorder to release a protected 489 decedentâs removed information unless there is a related request 490 on file with the county recorder for continued removal of the 491 decedentâs information or unless such removal is otherwise 492 prohibited by statute or by court order. The written request to 493 release the removed information upon the death of a protected 494 party must attach the certified copy of a death certificate or 495 court order and must be notarized, must confirm the request for 496 release is due to the death of a protected party, and must 497 specify the Official Records book and page number, instrument 498 number, or clerkâs file number for each document containing the 499 information to be released. A fee may not be charged for the 500 release of any document pursuant to such request. 501 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 502 necessity that the home addresses, telephone numbers, and dates 503 of birth of current county administrators, deputy county 504 administrators, assistant county administrators, city managers, 505 deputy city managers, and assistant city managers; the names, 506 home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, photographs, 507 and places of employment of the spouses and children of current 508 county administrators, deputy county administrators, assistant 509 county administrators, city managers, deputy city managers, and 510 assistant city managers; and the names and locations of schools 511 and day care facilities attended by the children of current 512 county administrators, deputy county administrators, assistant 513 county administrators, city managers, deputy city managers, and 514 assistant city managers be made exempt from s. 119.07(1), 515 Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State 516 Constitution. Such identifying and location information can be 517 used as a tool to perpetrate fraud against an individual or to 518 acquire sensitive personal, financial, medical, or familial 519 information, the release of which could cause great financial or 520 professional harm to the individual. In the course of performing 521 their managerial functions, current county administrators, 522 deputy county administrators, assistant county administrators, 523 city managers, deputy city managers, and assistant city managers 524 may make decisions and determinations that upset members of the 525 public and may incur the ill will of those residents, making 526 current county administrators, deputy county administrators, 527 assistant county administrators, city managers, deputy city 528 managers, and assistant city managers and their spouses and 529 children targets for acts of revenge. If such identifying and 530 location information is released, the safety of current county 531 administrators, deputy county administrators, assistant county 532 administrators, city managers, deputy city managers, and 533 assistant city managers and their spouses and children could be 534 seriously jeopardized. For these reasons, the Legislature finds 535 that it is a public necessity that such information be made 536 exempt from public records requirements. 537 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.